Utah statutes.
76-10-2002.   Burglary of a research facility -- Penalties.

(1)  A person is guilty of burglary of a research facility if he enters or remains unlawfully in a research facility with the intent to:

(a)  obtain unauthorized control over any property, sample, specimen, record, data, test result, or proprietary information in the facility;

(b)  alter or eradicate any sample, specimen, record, data, test result, or proprietary information in the facility;

(c)  damage, deface, or destroy any property in the facility;

(d)  release from confinement or remove any animal or biological vector in the facility regardless of whether or not that animal or vector is dangerous;

(e)  commit an assault on any person;

(f)  commit any other felony; or

(g)  interfere with the personnel or operations of a research facility through any conduct that does not constitute an assault.

(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1)(g) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.  A person who violates any other provision in this section is guilty of a felony of the second degree.

